Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.117

Health care professionals licensed in another state or United States territory or the District of Columbia—In-state practice on a limited basis—Requirements—Limitations.

(1) Persons licensed as health care professionals in another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, but not licensed by a disciplining authority specified in RCW 18.130.040, may practice in this state on a limited voluntary basis only as provided in this section.

(2) The volunteer health care professional's license must be for a profession substantially equivalent to a profession regulated by a disciplining authority listed in RCW 18.130.040.

(3) At least ten working days prior to the first day of volunteer practice, the volunteer health care professional must submit to the department an attestation that includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(a) A confirmation that the health care professional holds an active license to practice in any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia;

(b) A confirmation that the health care professional is not presently subject to any disciplinary action or investigation for criminal or professional misconduct in any jurisdiction;

(c) An acknowledgment that the health care professional understands he or she may perform only within the relevant professional scope of practice permitted under Washington law, or state of licensure, whichever is more restrictive;

(d) A confirmation that the health care professional has not volunteered in Washington for more than thirty days in the current calendar year;

(e) The contact information of the organization sponsoring the medical clinic or health care event, if any; and

(f) Anticipated volunteer practice dates.

(4) The attestation must be made on a form established by the secretary.

(5) Neither the volunteer health care professional nor the organization sponsoring a medical clinic or health care event, if any, may charge for any time or services performed in Washington. However, organizations sponsoring a medical clinic or health care event may pay or reimburse the volunteer health care professional for actual incurred travel costs.

(6) No health care professional permitted to practice in Washington under this section may volunteer more than thirty days in any calendar year.

(7) Any organization sponsoring a medical clinic or health care event using the services of any volunteer health care professional permitted to practice under this section must:

(a) Independently verify each requirement in subsection (3) of this section for each volunteer health care professional and retain proof of verification for two years after the last day of the medical clinic or health care event;

(b) Maintain the health care records of all patients evaluated or treated by a volunteer health care professional in compliance with chapter 70.02 RCW; and

(c) Ensure the health care records of all patients evaluated or treated by a volunteer health care professional are accessible to future health care professionals, if needed, in compliance with chapter 70.02 RCW.

(8) This section does not create any civil liability on the part of the state or any state agency, officer, employee, or agent.

(9) This section does not apply to the practice of health care professionals under chapter 38.10 or 38.52 RCW or under an agreement authorized by the United States congress for emergency management assistance.

[ 2014 c 126 s 1.]